Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 264.335 is amended to read:
264.335. In addition to the other powers granted to districts under  this chapter, after holding
a public hearing on the question,  a district may exercise the powers  granted to sanitary districts
under ORS 450.005 to 450.245 [ when] if:
(1) The district obtains all or part of its supply of water from a watershed[ ;] and:
[(2)] (a) The watershed is located in a sole-source aquifer designated prior to  September 29,
1991, by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under the Safe  Drinking Water Act (42
U.S.C. 300f et seq.);
[(3)] (b) The watershed is recognized under rules of the  Environmental Quality Commission as
a watershed  requiring protection from contamination in order to maintain high water quality;
[and] or
[(4)] (c) The district adopts a resolution declaring that the health of the residents of the district
[and] or the general  public interest requires the district to protect the water quality of the
watershed[ .]; and
(2) The district obtains written consent to its exercise of such  powers from any sanitary
district or other service provider that  has been providing sanitary service to territory that
will be served by the district pursuant to such exercise.
SECTION 2.  ORS 264.336 is amended to read:
264.336. Notwithstanding ORS 264.335, a district may exercise the powers  granted to sanitary
districts under ORS 450.005 to 450.245 if:
(1) The district meets the requirements of ORS 264.335 (1), (3) and (4) (2023 Edition);
(2) Any part of the territory of the district is covered by the major disaster declaration  related
to wildfires requested by the  Governor on September 14, 2020, and approved by the President of the
United States on September 15, 2020; and
(3) The district is adjacent to a  river that serves as a source of drinking water for a metropol-
itan area with a population greater than 100,000.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3910 (HB 3910-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3910 (HB 3910-A) Page 2